Maine, session 132, LD1329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1401, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1995, c. 482, Pt. A, §24, is
further amended to read:
1. Required information. A license must state, at a minimum, the name, date of birth,
place of residence or mailing address if different from the residence, of the licensee and the
permanent number assigned to that licensee. A license also must state whether the licensee
is a citizen of the United States, a noncitizen of the United States or an asylum seeker. A
name displayed on a license must be as the name appears on a birth certificate or a court
order or as the result of marriage.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1410, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2001, c. 671, §27, is
further amended to read:
C. The applicant's date of birth; and
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1410, sub-§2, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 437, §40, is
amended to read:
E. Any other information and identification that the Secretary of State by rule requires.;
and
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1410, sub-§2, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. A designation as to whether the applicant is a citizen of the United States, a
noncitizen of the United States or an asylum seeker.